Florida, session 2026, HB309.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
23
24 Section 1. Effective July 1, 2026, paragraphs (a) and (c)
25 of subsection (1) of section 893.03, Florida Statutes, are
Page 1 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
26 amended to read:
27 893.03 Standards and schedules.—The substances enumerated
28 in this section are controlled by this chapter. The controlled
29 substances listed or to be listed in Schedules I, II, III, IV,
30 and V are included by whatever official, common, usual,
31 chemical, trade name, or class designated. The provisions of
32 this section shall not be construed to include within any of the
33 schedules contained in this section any excluded drugs listed
34 within the purview of 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.22, styled "Excluded
35 Substances"; 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.24, styled "Exempt Chemical
36 Preparations"; 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.32, styled "Exempted
37 Prescription Products"; or 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.34, styled "Exempt
38 Anabolic Steroid Products."
39 (1) SCHEDULE I.—A substance in Schedule I has a high
40 potential for abuse and has no currently accepted medical use in
41 treatment in the United States and in its use under medical
42 supervision does not meet accepted safety standards. The
43 following substances are controlled in Schedule I:
44 (a) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
45 another schedule, any of the following substances, including
46 their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
47 esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of such isomers,
48 esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific
49 chemical designation:
50 1. Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl.
Page 2 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
51 2. Acetylmethadol.
52 3. Allylprodine.
53 4. Alphacetylmethadol (except levo-alphacetylmethadol,
54 also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate,
55 or LAAM).
56 5. Alphamethadol.
57 6. Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-betaphenyl)
58 ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-
59 (N-propanilido) piperidine).
60 7. Alpha-methylthiofentanyl.
61 8. Alphameprodine.
62 9. Benzethidine.
63 10. Benzylfentanyl.
64 11. Betacetylmethadol.
65 12. Beta-hydroxyfentanyl.
66 13. Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl.
67 14. Betameprodine.
68 15. Betamethadol.
69 16. Betaprodine.
70 17. Clonitazene.
71 18. Dextromoramide.
72 19. Diampromide.
73 20. Diethylthiambutene.
74 21. Difenoxin.
75 22. Dimenoxadol.
Page 3 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
76 23. Dimepheptanol.
77 24. Dimethylthiambutene.
78 25. Dioxaphetyl butyrate.
79 26. Dipipanone.
80 27. Ethylmethylthiambutene.
81 28. Etonitazene.
82 29. Etoxeridine.
83 30. Flunitrazepam.
84 31. Furethidine.
85 32. 7-Hydroxymitragynine (methyl (E)-2-[(2S,3S,7aS,12bS)-
86 3-ethyl-7a-hydroxy-8-methoxy-2,3,4,6,7,12b-hexahydro-1H-
87 indolo[2,3-a]quinolizin-2-yl]-3-methoxyprop-2-enoate)
88 concentrated at a level above 400 parts per million on a dry-
89 weight basis.
90 33.32. Hydroxypethidine.
91 34.33. Ketobemidone.
92 35.34. Levomoramide.
93 36.35. Levophenacylmorphan.
94 37.36. Desmethylprodine (1-Methyl-4-Phenyl-4-
95 Propionoxypiperidine).
96 38.37. 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-
97 piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide).
98 39.38. 3-Methylthiofentanyl.
99 40.39. Morpheridine.
100 41.40. Noracymethadol.
Page 4 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
101 42.41. Norlevorphanol.
102 43.42. Normethadone.
103 44.43. Norpipanone.
104 45.44. Para-Fluorofentanyl.
105 46.45. Phenadoxone.
106 47.46. Phenampromide.
107 48.47. Phenomorphan.
108 49.48. Phenoperidine.
109 50.49. PEPAP (1-(2-Phenylethyl)-4-Phenyl-4-
110 Acetyloxypiperidine).
111 51.50. Piritramide.
112 52.51. Proheptazine.
113 53.52. Properidine.
114 54.53. Propiram.
115 55.54. Racemoramide.
116 56.55. Thenylfentanyl.
117 57.56. Thiofentanyl.
118 58.57. Tianeptine.
119 59.58. Tilidine.
120 60.59. Trimeperidine.
121 61.60. Acetylfentanyl.
122 62.61. Butyrylfentanyl.
123 63.62. Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl.
124 64.63. Fentanyl derivatives. Unless specifically excepted,
125 listed in another schedule, or contained within a pharmaceutical
Page 5 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
126 product approved by the United States Food and Drug
127 Administration, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation,
128 including its salts, isomers, esters, or ethers, and salts of
129 isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence of such salts
130 is possible within any of the following specific chemical
131 designations containing a 4-anilidopiperidine structure:
132 a. With or without substitution at the carbonyl of the
133 aniline moiety with alkyl, alkenyl, carboalkoxy, cycloalkyl,
134 methoxyalkyl, cyanoalkyl, or aryl groups, or furanyl,
135 dihydrofuranyl, benzyl moiety, or rings containing heteroatoms
136 sulfur, oxygen, or nitrogen;
137 b. With or without substitution at the piperidine amino
138 moiety with a phenethyl, benzyl, alkylaryl (including
139 heteroaromatics), alkyltetrazolyl ring, or an alkyl or
140 carbomethoxy group, whether or not further substituted in the
141 ring or group;
142 c. With or without substitution or addition to the
143 piperdine ring to any extent with one or more methyl,
144 carbomethoxy, methoxy, methoxymethyl, aryl, allyl, or ester
145 groups;
146 d. With or without substitution of one or more hydrogen
147 atoms for halogens, or methyl, alkyl, or methoxy groups, in the
148 aromatic ring of the anilide moiety;
149 e. With or without substitution at the alpha or beta
150 position of the piperidine ring with alkyl, hydroxyl, or methoxy
Page 6 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
151 groups;
152 f. With or without substitution of the benzene ring of the
153 anilide moiety for an aromatic heterocycle; and
154 g. With or without substitution of the piperidine ring for
155 a pyrrolidine ring, perhydroazepine ring, or azepine ring;
156 excluding, Alfentanil, Carfentanil, Fentanyl, and Sufentanil;
157 including, but not limited to:
158 (I) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl.
159 (II) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-betaphenyl)
160 ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-
161 (N-propanilido) piperidine).
162 (III) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl.
163 (IV) Benzylfentanyl.
164 (V) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl.
165 (VI) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl.
166 (VII) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-
167 piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide).
168 (VIII) 3-Methylthiofentanyl.
169 (IX) Para-Fluorofentanyl.
170 (X) Thenylfentanyl or Thienyl fentanyl.
171 (XI) Thiofentanyl.
172 (XII) Acetylfentanyl.
173 (XIII) Butyrylfentanyl.
174 (XIV) Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl.
175 (XV) Lofentanil.
Page 7 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
176 (XVI) Ocfentanil.
177 (XVII) Ohmfentanyl.
178 (XVIII) Benzodioxolefentanyl.
179 (XIX) Furanyl fentanyl.
180 (XX) Pentanoyl fentanyl.
181 (XXI) Cyclopentyl fentanyl.
182 (XXII) Isobutyryl fentanyl.
183 (XXIII) Remifentanil.
184 65.64. Nitazene derivatives. Unless specifically excepted,
185 listed in another schedule, or contained within a pharmaceutical
186 product approved by the United States Food and Drug
187 Administration, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation,
188 including its salts, isomers, esters, or ethers, and salts of
189 isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence of such salts
190 is possible within any of the following specific chemical
191 designations containing a benzimidazole ring with an ethylamine
192 substitution at the 1-position and a benzyl ring substitution at
193 the 2-position structure:
194 a. With or without substitution on the benzimidazole ring
195 with alkyl, alkoxy, carboalkoxy, amino, nitro, or aryl groups,
196 or halogens;
197 b. With or without substitution at the ethylamine amino
198 moiety with alkyl, dialkyl, acetyl, or benzyl groups, whether or
199 not further substituted in the ring system;
200 c. With or without inclusion of the ethylamine amino
Page 8 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
201 moiety in a cyclic structure;
202 d. With or without substitution of the benzyl ring; or
203 e. With or without replacement of the benzyl ring with an
204 aromatic ring, including, but not limited to:
205 (I) Butonitazene.
206 (II) Clonitazene.
207 (III) Etodesnitazene.
208 (IV) Etonitazene.
209 (V) Flunitazene.
210 (VI) Isotodesnitazene.
211 (VII) Isotonitazene.
212 (VIII) Metodesnitazene.
213 (IX) Metonitazene.
214 (X) Nitazene.
215 (XI) N-Desethyl Etonitazene.
216 (XII) N-Desethyl Isotonitazene.
217 (XIII) N-Piperidino Etonitazene.
218 (XIV) N-Pyrrolidino Etonitazene.
219 (XV) Protonitazene.
220 (c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
221 another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
222 preparation that contains any quantity of the following
223 hallucinogenic substances or that contains any of their salts,
224 isomers, including optical, positional, or geometric isomers,
225 homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic analogs, esters, ethers, and
Page 9 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
226 salts of isomers, homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic analogs,
227 esters, or ethers, if the existence of such salts, isomers, and
228 salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
229 designation or class description:
230 1. Alpha-Ethyltryptamine.
231 2. 4-Methylaminorex (2-Amino-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-
232 oxazoline).
233 3. Aminorex (2-Amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline).
234 4. DOB (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
235 5. 2C-B (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
236 6. Bufotenine.
237 7. Cannabis.
238 8. Cathinone.
239 9. DET (Diethyltryptamine).
240 10. 2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine.
241 11. DOET (4-Ethyl-2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine).
242 12. DMT (Dimethyltryptamine).
243 13. PCE (N-Ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine) (Ethylamine
244 analog of phencyclidine).
245 14. JB-318 (N-Ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate).
246 15. N-Ethylamphetamine.
247 16. Fenethylline.
248 17. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-hydroxyamphetamine.
249 18. Ibogaine.
250 19. LSD (Lysergic acid diethylamide).
Page 10 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
251 20. Mescaline.
252 21. Methcathinone.
253 22. 5-Methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine.
254 23. PMA (4-Methoxyamphetamine).
255 24. PMMA (4-Methoxymethamphetamine).
256 25. DOM (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
257 26. MDEA (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine).
258 27. MDA (3,4-Methylenedioxyamphetamine).
259 28. JB-336 (N-Methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate).
260 29. N,N-Dimethylamphetamine.
261 30. Parahexyl.
262 31. Peyote.
263 32. PCPY (N-(1-Phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine) (Pyrrolidine
264 analog of phencyclidine).
265 33. Psilocybin.
266 34. Psilocyn.
267 35. Salvia divinorum, except for any drug product approved
268 by the United States Food and Drug Administration which contains
269 Salvia divinorum or its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
270 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, if the existence of such
271 isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the
272 specific chemical designation.
273 36. Salvinorin A, except for any drug product approved by
274 the United States Food and Drug Administration which contains
275 Salvinorin A or its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of
Page 11 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
276 isomers, esters, and ethers, if the existence of such isomers,
277 esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific
278 chemical designation.
279 37. Xylazine, except for a xylazine animal drug product
280 approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
281 the use of which conforms to the approved application or is
282 authorized under 21 U.S.C. s. 360b(a)(4). The manufacture,
283 importation, distribution, prescribing, or sale of xylazine for
284 human use is not subject to this exception.
285 38. TCP (1-[1-(2-Thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine)
286 (Thiophene analog of phencyclidine).
287 39. 3,4,5-Trimethoxyamphetamine.
288 40. Methylone (3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone).
289 41. MDPV (3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone).
290 42. Methylmethcathinone.
291 43. Methoxymethcathinone.
292 44. Fluoromethcathinone.
293 45. Methylethcathinone.
294 46. CP 47,497 (2-(3-Hydroxycyclohexyl)-5-(2-methyloctan-2-
295 yl)phenol) and its dimethyloctyl (C8) homologue.
296 47. HU-210 [(6aR,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-
297 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-
298 ol].
299 48. JWH-018 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
300 49. JWH-073 (1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
Page 12 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
301 50. JWH-200 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-
302 naphthoyl)indole).
303 51. BZP (Benzylpiperazine).
304 52. Fluorophenylpiperazine.
305 53. Methylphenylpiperazine.
306 54. Chlorophenylpiperazine.
307 55. Methoxyphenylpiperazine.
308 56. DBZP (1,4-Dibenzylpiperazine).
309 57. TFMPP (Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine).
310 58. MBDB (Methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine) or (3,4-
311 Methylenedioxy-N-methylbutanamine).
312 59. 5-Hydroxy-AMT (5-Hydroxy-alpha-methyltryptamine).
313 60. 5-Hydroxy-N-methyltryptamine.
314 61. 5-MeO-MiPT (5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine).
315 62. 5-MeO-AMT (5-Methoxy-alpha-methyltryptamine).
316 63. Methyltryptamine.
317 64. 5-MeO-DMT (5-Methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine).
318 65. 5-Me-DMT (5-Methyl-N,N-dimethyltryptamine).
319 66. Tyramine (4-Hydroxyphenethylamine).
320 67. 5-MeO-DiPT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine).
321 68. DiPT (N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine).
322 69. DPT (N,N-Dipropyltryptamine).
323 70. 4-Hydroxy-DiPT (4-Hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine).
324 71. 5-MeO-DALT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diallyltryptamine).
325 72. DOI (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
Page 13 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
326 73. DOC (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
327 74. 2C-E (4-Ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
328 75. 2C-T-4 (4-Isopropylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
329 76. 2C-C (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
330 77. 2C-T (4-Methylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
331 78. 2C-T-2 (4-Ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
332 79. 2C-T-7 (4-(n)-Propylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
333 80. 2C-I (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
334 81. Butylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
335 methylaminobutyrophenone).
336 82. Ethcathinone.
337 83. Ethylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone).
338 84. Naphyrone (Naphthylpyrovalerone).
339 85. Dimethylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N,N-
340 dimethylcathinone).
341 86. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N,N-diethylcathinone.
342 87. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-propiophenone.
343 88. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-bromopropiophenone.
344 89. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-propiophenone-2-oxime.
345 90. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylcathinone.
346 91. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylmethcathinone.
347 92. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylethcathinone.
348 93. Bromomethcathinone.
349 94. Buphedrone (alpha-Methylamino-butyrophenone).
350 95. Eutylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
Page 14 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
351 ethylaminobutyrophenone).
352 96. Dimethylcathinone.
353 97. Dimethylmethcathinone.
354 98. Pentylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
355 methylaminovalerophenone).
356 99. MDPPP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
357 pyrrolidinopropiophenone).
358 100. MDPBP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
359 pyrrolidinobutyrophenone).
360 101. MOPPP (Methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone).
361 102. MPHP (Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone).
362 103. BTCP (Benzothiophenylcyclohexylpiperidine) or BCP
363 (Benocyclidine).
364 104. F-MABP (Fluoromethylaminobutyrophenone).
365 105. MeO-PBP (Methoxypyrrolidinobutyrophenone).
366 106. Et-PBP (Ethylpyrrolidinobutyrophenone).
367 107. 3-Me-4-MeO-MCAT (3-Methyl-4-Methoxymethcathinone).
368 108. Me-EABP (Methylethylaminobutyrophenone).
369 109. Etizolam.
370 110. PPP (Pyrrolidinopropiophenone).
371 111. PBP (Pyrrolidinobutyrophenone).
372 112. PVP (Pyrrolidinovalerophenone) or
373 (Pyrrolidinopentiophenone).
374 113. MPPP (Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone).
375 114. JWH-007 (1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
Page 15 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
376 115. JWH-015 (1-Propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
377 116. JWH-019 (1-Hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
378 117. JWH-020 (1-Heptyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
379 118. JWH-072 (1-Propyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
380 119. JWH-081 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole).
381 120. JWH-122 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole).
382 121. JWH-133 ((6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-Trimethyl-3-(2-
383 methylpentan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene).
384 122. JWH-175 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthylmethyl)indole).
385 123. JWH-201 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole).
386 124. JWH-203 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole).
387 125. JWH-210 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole).
388 126. JWH-250 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole).
389 127. JWH-251 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole).
390 128. JWH-302 (1-Pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole).
391 129. JWH-398 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole).
392 130. HU-211 ((6aS,10aS)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-
393 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-
394 ol).
395 131. HU-308 ([(1R,2R,5R)-2-[2,6-Dimethoxy-4-(2-
396 methyloctan-2-yl)phenyl]-7,7-dimethyl-4-bicyclo[3.1.1]hept-3-
397 enyl] methanol).
398 132. HU-331 (3-Hydroxy-2-[(1R,6R)-3-methyl-6-(1-
399 methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-1-yl]-5-pentyl-2,5-cyclohexadiene-
400 1,4-dione).
Page 16 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
401 133. CB-13 (4-Pentyloxy-1-(1-naphthoyl)naphthalene).
402 134. CB-25 (N-Cyclopropyl-11-(3-hydroxy-5-pentylphenoxy)-
403 undecanamide).
404 135. CB-52 (N-Cyclopropyl-11-(2-hexyl-5-hydroxyphenoxy)-
405 undecanamide).
406 136. CP 55,940 (2-[3-Hydroxy-6-propanol-cyclohexyl]-5-(2-
407 methyloctan-2-yl)phenol).
408 137. AM-694 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole).
409 138. AM-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
410 139. RCS-4 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole).
411 140. RCS-8 (1-(2-Cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-
412 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole).
413 141. WIN55,212-2 ((R)-(+)-[2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-
414 morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-
415 naphthalenylmethanone).
416 142. WIN55,212-3 ([(3S)-2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-
417 morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-
418 naphthalenylmethanone).
419 143. Pentedrone (alpha-Methylaminovalerophenone).
420 144. Fluoroamphetamine.
421 145. Fluoromethamphetamine.
422 146. Methoxetamine.
423 147. Methiopropamine.
424 148. Methylbuphedrone (Methyl-alpha-
425 methylaminobutyrophenone).
Page 17 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
426 149. APB ((2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran).
427 150. APDB ((2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran).
428 151. UR-144 (1-Pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3-
429 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
430 152. XLR11 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
431 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
432 153. Chloro UR-144 (1-(Chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
433 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
434 154. AKB48 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-pentylindazole-3-
435 carboxamide).
436 155. AM-2233(1-[(N-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2-
437 iodobenzoyl)indole).
438 156. STS-135 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-3-
439 carboxamide).
440 157. URB-597 ((3′-(Aminocarbonyl)[1,1′-biphenyl]-3-yl)-
441 cyclohexylcarbamate).
442 158. URB-602 ([1,1′-Biphenyl]-3-yl-carbamic acid,
443 cyclohexyl ester).
444 159. URB-754 (6-Methyl-2-[(4-methylphenyl)amino]-1-
445 benzoxazin-4-one).
446 160. 2C-D (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
447 161. 2C-H (2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine).
448 162. 2C-N (4-Nitro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
449 163. 2C-P (4-(n)-Propyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
450 164. 25I-NBOMe (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
Page 18 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
451 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
452 165. MDMA (3,4-Methylenedioxymethamphetamine).
453 166. PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-pentylindole-3-carboxylate).
454 167. Fluoro PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3-
455 carboxylate).
456 168. BB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indole-3-
457 carboxylate).
458 169. Fluoro AKB48 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-
459 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
460 170. AB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
461 pentylindazole-3-carboxamide).
462 171. AB-FUBINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
463 (4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
464 172. ADB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-
465 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide).
466 173. Fluoro ADBICA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-
467 yl)-1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
468 174. 25B-NBOMe (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
469 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
470 175. 25C-NBOMe (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
471 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
472 176. AB-CHMINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
473 (cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
474 177. FUB-PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indole-3-
475 carboxylate).
Page 19 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
476 178. Fluoro-NNEI (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-
477 (fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
478 179. Fluoro-AMB (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
479 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
480 180. THJ-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1-
481 naphthoyl)indazole).
482 181. AM-855 ((4aR,12bR)-8-Hexyl-2,5,5-trimethyl-
483 1,4,4a,8,9,10,11,12b-octahydronaphtho[3,2-c]isochromen-12-ol).
484 182. AM-905 ((6aR,9R,10aR)-3-[(E)-Hept-1-enyl]-9-
485 (hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-6a,7,8,9,10,10a-
486 hexahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol).
487 183. AM-906 ((6aR,9R,10aR)-3-[(Z)-Hept-1-enyl]-9-
488 (hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-6a,7,8,9,10,10a-
489 hexahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol).
490 184. AM-2389 ((6aR,9R,10aR)-3-(1-Hexyl-cyclobut-1-yl)-
491 6a,7,8,9,10,10a-hexahydro-6,6-dimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-1,9
492 diol).
493 185. HU-243 ((6aR,8S,9S,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-
494 dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-8,9-ditritio-7,8,10,10a-
495 tetrahydro-6aH-benzo[c]chromen-1-ol).
496 186. HU-336 ((6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-Trimethyl-3-pentyl-
497 6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydro-1H-benzo[c]chromene-1,4(6H)-dione).
498 187. MAPB ((2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran).
499 188. 5-IT (2-(1H-Indol-5-yl)-1-methyl-ethylamine).
500 189. 6-IT (2-(1H-Indol-6-yl)-1-methyl-ethylamine).
Page 20 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
501 190. Synthetic Cannabinoids.—Unless specifically excepted
502 or unless listed in another schedule or contained within a
503 pharmaceutical product approved by the United States Food and
504 Drug Administration, any material, compound, mixture, or
505 preparation that contains any quantity of a synthetic
506 cannabinoid found to be in any of the following chemical class
507 descriptions, or homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic analogs,
508 isomers (including optical, positional, or geometric), esters,
509 ethers, salts, and salts of homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic
510 analogs, isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence of
511 such homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic analogs, isomers, esters,
512 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, or ethers is
513 possible within the specific chemical class or designation.
514 Since nomenclature of these synthetically produced cannabinoids
515 is not internationally standardized and may continually evolve,
516 these structures or the compounds of these structures shall be
517 included under this subparagraph, regardless of their specific
518 numerical designation of atomic positions covered, if it can be
519 determined through a recognized method of scientific testing or
520 analysis that the substance contains properties that fit within
521 one or more of the following categories:
522 a. Tetrahydrocannabinols.—Any tetrahydrocannabinols
523 naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis, the
524 synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant
525 or in the resinous extracts of the genus Cannabis, or synthetic
Page 21 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
526 substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical
527 structure and pharmacological activity, including, but not
528 limited to, Delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinols and their optical
529 isomers, Delta 8 tetrahydrocannabinols and their optical
530 isomers, Delta 6a,10a tetrahydrocannabinols and their optical
531 isomers, or any compound containing a tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene
532 structure with substitution at either or both the 3-position or
533 9-position, with or without substitution at the 1-position with
534 hydroxyl or alkoxy groups, including, but not limited to:
535 (I) Tetrahydrocannabinol.
536 (II) HU-210 ((6aR,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-
537 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-
538 ol).
539 (III) HU-211 ((6aS,10aS)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-
540 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-
541 ol).
542 (IV) JWH-051 ((6aR,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-
543 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene).
544 (V) JWH-133 ((6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-Trimethyl-3-(2-methylpentan-
545 2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene).
546 (VI) JWH-057 ((6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-Trimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-
547 2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene).
548 (VII) JWH-359 ((6aR,10aR)-1-Methoxy-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-
549 (2,3-dimethylpentan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-
550 tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene).
Page 22 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
551 (VIII) AM-087 ((6aR,10aR)-3-(2-Methyl-6-bromohex-2-yl)-
552 6,6,9-trimethyl-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol).
553 (IX) AM-411 ((6aR,10aR)-3-(1-Adamantyl)-6,6,9-trimethyl-
554 6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol).
555 (X) Parahexyl.
556 b. Naphthoylindoles, Naphthoylindazoles,
557 Naphthoylcarbazoles, Naphthylmethylindoles,
558 Naphthylmethylindazoles, and Naphthylmethylcarbazoles.—Any
559 compound containing a naphthoylindole, naphthoylindazole,
560 naphthoylcarbazole, naphthylmethylindole,
561 naphthylmethylindazole, or naphthylmethylcarbazole structure,
562 with or without substitution on the indole, indazole, or
563 carbazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the
564 naphthyl ring to any extent, including, but not limited to:
565 (I) JWH-007 (1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
566 (II) JWH-011 (1-(1-Methylhexyl)-2-methyl-3-(1-
567 naphthoyl)indole).
568 (III) JWH-015 (1-Propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
569 (IV) JWH-016 (1-Butyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
570 (V) JWH-018 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
571 (VI) JWH-019 (1-Hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
572 (VII) JWH-020 (1-Heptyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
573 (VIII) JWH-022 (1-(4-Pentenyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
574 (IX) JWH-071 (1-Ethyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
575 (X) JWH-072 (1-Propyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
Page 23 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
576 (XI) JWH-073 (1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
577 (XII) JWH-080 (1-Butyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole).
578 (XIII) JWH-081 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole).
579 (XIV) JWH-098 (1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-
580 naphthoyl)indole).
581 (XV) JWH-116 (1-Pentyl-2-ethyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
582 (XVI) JWH-122 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole).
583 (XVII) JWH-149 (1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methyl-1-
584 naphthoyl)indole).
585 (XVIII) JWH-164 (1-Pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-
586 naphthoyl)indole).
587 (XIX) JWH-175 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthylmethyl)indole).
588 (XX) JWH-180 (1-Propyl-3-(4-propyl-1-naphthoyl)indole).
589 (XXI) JWH-182 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-propyl-1-naphthoyl)indole).
590 (XXII) JWH-184 (1-Pentyl-3-[(4-methyl)-1-
591 naphthylmethyl]indole).
592 (XXIII) JWH-193 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(4-methyl-1-
593 naphthoyl)indole).
594 (XXIV) JWH-198 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(4-methoxy-1-
595 naphthoyl)indole).
596 (XXV) JWH-200 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-
597 naphthoyl)indole).
598 (XXVI) JWH-210 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole).
599 (XXVII) JWH-387 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-bromo-1-naphthoyl)indole).
600 (XXVIII) JWH-398 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-
Page 24 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
601 naphthoyl)indole).
602 (XXIX) JWH-412 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-fluoro-1-naphthoyl)indole).
603 (XXX) JWH-424 (1-Pentyl-3-(8-bromo-1-naphthoyl)indole).
604 (XXXI) AM-1220 (1-[(1-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(1-
605 naphthoyl)indole).
606 (XXXII) AM-1235 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-6-nitro-3-(1-
607 naphthoyl)indole).
608 (XXXIII) AM-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1-
609 naphthoyl)indole).
610 (XXXIV) Chloro JWH-018 (1-(Chloropentyl)-3-(1-
611 naphthoyl)indole).
612 (XXXV) Bromo JWH-018 (1-(Bromopentyl)-3-(1-
613 naphthoyl)indole).
614 (XXXVI) AM-2232 (1-(4-Cyanobutyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole).
615 (XXXVII) THJ-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1-
616 naphthoyl)indazole).
617 (XXXVIII) MAM-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(4-methyl-1-
618 naphthoyl)indole).
619 (XXXIX) EAM-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(4-ethyl-1-
620 naphthoyl)indole).
621 (XL) EG-018 (9-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)carbazole).
622 (XLI) EG-2201 (9-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1-
623 naphthoyl)carbazole).
624 c. Naphthoylpyrroles.—Any compound containing a
625 naphthoylpyrrole structure, with or without substitution on the
Page 25 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
626 pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the
627 naphthyl ring to any extent, including, but not limited to:
628 (I) JWH-030 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole).
629 (II) JWH-031 (1-Hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole).
630 (III) JWH-145 (1-Pentyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole).
631 (IV) JWH-146 (1-Heptyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole).
632 (V) JWH-147 (1-Hexyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole).
633 (VI) JWH-307 (1-Pentyl-5-(2-fluorophenyl)-3-(1-
634 naphthoyl)pyrrole).
635 (VII) JWH-309 (1-Pentyl-5-(1-naphthalenyl)-3-(1-
636 naphthoyl)pyrrole).
637 (VIII) JWH-368 (1-Pentyl-5-(3-fluorophenyl)-3-(1-
638 naphthoyl)pyrrole).
639 (IX) JWH-369 (1-Pentyl-5-(2-chlorophenyl)-3-(1-
640 naphthoyl)pyrrole).
641 (X) JWH-370 (1-Pentyl-5-(2-methylphenyl)-3-(1-
642 naphthoyl)pyrrole).
643 d. Naphthylmethylenindenes.—Any compound containing a
644 naphthylmethylenindene structure, with or without substitution
645 at the 3-position of the indene ring to any extent, whether or
646 not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent, including,
647 but not limited to, JWH-176 (3-Pentyl-1-
648 (naphthylmethylene)indene).
649 e. Phenylacetylindoles and Phenylacetylindazoles.—Any
650 compound containing a phenylacetylindole or phenylacetylindazole
Page 26 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
651 structure, with or without substitution on the indole or
652 indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the
653 phenyl ring to any extent, including, but not limited to:
654 (I) JWH-167 (1-Pentyl-3-(phenylacetyl)indole).
655 (II) JWH-201 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole).
656 (III) JWH-203 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole).
657 (IV) JWH-250 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole).
658 (V) JWH-251 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole).
659 (VI) JWH-302 (1-Pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole).
660 (VII) Cannabipiperidiethanone.
661 (VIII) RCS-8 (1-(2-Cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-
662 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole).
663 f. Cyclohexylphenols.—Any compound containing a
664 cyclohexylphenol structure, with or without substitution at the
665 5-position of the phenolic ring to any extent, whether or not
666 substituted on the cyclohexyl ring to any extent, including, but
667 not limited to:
668 (I) CP 47,497 (2-(3-Hydroxycyclohexyl)-5-(2-methyloctan-2-
669 yl)phenol).
670 (II) Cannabicyclohexanol (CP 47,497 dimethyloctyl (C8)
671 homologue).
672 (III) CP-55,940 (2-(3-Hydroxy-6-propanol-cyclohexyl)-5-(2-
673 methyloctan-2-yl)phenol).
674 g. Benzoylindoles and Benzoylindazoles.—Any compound
675 containing a benzoylindole or benzoylindazole structure, with or
Page 27 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
676 without substitution on the indole or indazole ring to any
677 extent, whether or not substituted on the phenyl ring to any
678 extent, including, but not limited to:
679 (I) AM-679 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole).
680 (II) AM-694 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole).
681 (III) AM-1241 (1-[(N-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2-
682 iodo-5-nitrobenzoyl)indole).
683 (IV) Pravadoline (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-2-methyl-3-
684 (4-methoxybenzoyl)indole).
685 (V) AM-2233 (1-[(N-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2-
686 iodobenzoyl)indole).
687 (VI) RCS-4 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole).
688 (VII) RCS-4 C4 homologue (1-Butyl-3-(4-
689 methoxybenzoyl)indole).
690 (VIII) AM-630 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-2-methyl-6-iodo-
691 3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole).
692 h. Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles and
693 Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindazoles.—Any compound containing a
694 tetramethylcyclopropanoylindole or
695 tetramethylcyclopropanoylindazole structure, with or without
696 substitution on the indole or indazole ring to any extent,
697 whether or not substituted on the tetramethylcyclopropyl group
698 to any extent, including, but not limited to:
699 (I) UR-144 (1-Pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3-
700 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
Page 28 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
701 (II) XLR11 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
702 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
703 (III) Chloro UR-144 (1-(Chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
704 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
705 (IV) A-796,260 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(2,2,3,3-
706 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
707 (V) A-834,735 (1-[4-(Tetrahydropyranyl)methyl]-3-(2,2,3,3-
708 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
709 (VI) M-144 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-2-methyl-3-(2,2,3,3-
710 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
711 (VII) FUB-144 (1-(4-Fluorobenzyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
712 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
713 (VIII) FAB-144 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
714 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indazole).
715 (IX) XLR12 (1-(4,4,4-Trifluorobutyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
716 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
717 (X) AB-005 (1-[(1-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2,2,3,3-
718 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole).
719 i. Adamantoylindoles, Adamantoylindazoles, Adamantylindole
720 carboxamides, and Adamantylindazole carboxamides.—Any compound
721 containing an adamantoyl indole, adamantoyl indazole, adamantyl
722 indole carboxamide, or adamantyl indazole carboxamide structure,
723 with or without substitution on the indole or indazole ring to
724 any extent, whether or not substituted on the adamantyl ring to
725 any extent, including, but not limited to:
Page 29 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
726 (I) AKB48 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide).
727 (II) Fluoro AKB48 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-
728 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
729 (III) STS-135 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-3-
730 carboxamide).
731 (IV) AM-1248 (1-(1-Methylpiperidine)methyl-3-(1-
732 adamantoyl)indole).
733 (V) AB-001 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-adamantoyl)indole).
734 (VI) APICA (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-pentylindole-3-carboxamide).
735 (VII) Fluoro AB-001 (1-(Fluoropentyl)-3-(1-
736 adamantoyl)indole).
737 j. Quinolinylindolecarboxylates,
738 Quinolinylindazolecarboxylates, Quinolinylindolecarboxamides,
739 and Quinolinylindazolecarboxamides.—Any compound containing a
740 quinolinylindole carboxylate, quinolinylindazole carboxylate,
741 isoquinolinylindole carboxylate, isoquinolinylindazole
742 carboxylate, quinolinylindole carboxamide, quinolinylindazole
743 carboxamide, isoquinolinylindole carboxamide, or
744 isoquinolinylindazole carboxamide structure, with or without
745 substitution on the indole or indazole ring to any extent,
746 whether or not substituted on the quinoline or isoquinoline ring
747 to any extent, including, but not limited to:
748 (I) PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-pentylindole-3-carboxylate).
749 (II) Fluoro PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3-
750 carboxylate).
Page 30 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
751 (III) BB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indole-3-
752 carboxylate).
753 (IV) FUB-PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indole-3-
754 carboxylate).
755 (V) NPB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxylate).
756 (VI) Fluoro NPB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(fluoropentyl)indazole-
757 3-carboxylate).
758 (VII) FUB-NPB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-
759 3-carboxylate).
760 (VIII) THJ (8-Quinolinyl 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide).
761 (IX) Fluoro THJ (8-Quinolinyl 1-(fluoropentyl)indazole-3-
762 carboxamide).
763 k. Naphthylindolecarboxylates and
764 Naphthylindazolecarboxylates.—Any compound containing a
765 naphthylindole carboxylate or naphthylindazole carboxylate
766 structure, with or without substitution on the indole or
767 indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the
768 naphthyl ring to any extent, including, but not limited to:
769 (I) NM-2201 (1-Naphthalenyl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-3-
770 carboxylate).
771 (II) SDB-005 (1-Naphthalenyl 1-pentylindazole-3-
772 carboxylate).
773 (III) Fluoro SDB-005 (1-Naphthalenyl 1-
774 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxylate).
775 (IV) FDU-PB-22 (1-Naphthalenyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indole-3-
Page 31 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
776 carboxylate).
777 (V) 3-CAF (2-Naphthalenyl 1-(2-fluorophenyl)indazole-3-
778 carboxylate).
779 l. Naphthylindole carboxamides and Naphthylindazole
780 carboxamides.—Any compound containing a naphthylindole
781 carboxamide or naphthylindazole carboxamide structure, with or
782 without substitution on the indole or indazole ring to any
783 extent, whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any
784 extent, including, but not limited to:
785 (I) NNEI (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-pentylindole-3-carboxamide).
786 (II) Fluoro-NNEI (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-
787 (fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
788 (III) Chloro-NNEI (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-
789 (chloropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
790 (IV) MN-18 (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-pentylindazole-3-
791 carboxamide).
792 (V) Fluoro MN-18 (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-
793 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
794 m. Alkylcarbonyl indole carboxamides, Alkylcarbonyl
795 indazole carboxamides, Alkylcarbonyl indole carboxylates, and
796 Alkylcarbonyl indazole carboxylates.—Any compound containing an
797 alkylcarbonyl group, including 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl,
798 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-1-oxo-3-
799 phenylpropan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl, with an
800 indole carboxamide, indazole carboxamide, indole carboxylate, or
Page 32 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
801 indazole carboxylate, with or without substitution on the indole
802 or indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on
803 the alkylcarbonyl group to any extent, including, but not
804 limited to:
805 (I) ADBICA, (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
806 pentylindole-3-carboxamide).
807 (II) Fluoro ADBICA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-
808 yl)-1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
809 (III) Fluoro ABICA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-
810 1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
811 (IV) AB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
812 pentylindazole-3-carboxamide).
813 (V) Fluoro AB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-
814 yl)-1-(fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
815 (VI) ADB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-
816 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide).
817 (VII) Fluoro ADB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-
818 oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
819 (VIII) AB-FUBINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-
820 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
821 (IX) ADB-FUBINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-
822 yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
823 (X) AB-CHMINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
824 (cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
825 (XI) MA-CHMINACA (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-
Page 33 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
826 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
827 (XII) MAB-CHMINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-
828 yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
829 (XIII) AMB (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
830 pentylindazole-3-carboxamide).
831 (XIV) Fluoro-AMB (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-
832 1-(fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
833 (XV) FUB-AMB (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-
834 fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
835 (XVI) MDMB-CHMINACA (N-(1-Methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-
836 2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
837 (XVII) MDMB-FUBINACA (N-(1-Methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-
838 oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
839 (XVIII) MDMB-CHMICA (N-(1-Methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-
840 2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
841 (XIX) PX-1 (N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-(5-
842 fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
843 (XX) PX-2 (N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-(5-
844 fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
845 (XXI) PX-3 (N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-
846 (cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
847 (XXII) PX-4 (N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-(4-
848 fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide).
849 (XXIII) MO-CHMINACA (N-(1-Methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-
850 2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxylate).
Page 34 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
851 n. Cumylindolecarboxamides and Cumylindazolecarboxamides.—
852 Any compound containing a N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl) indole
853 carboxamide or N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl) indazole carboxamide
854 structure, with or without substitution on the indole or
855 indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the
856 phenyl ring of the cumyl group to any extent, including, but not
857 limited to:
858 (I) CUMYL-PICA (N-(2-Phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-pentylindole-3-
859 carboxamide).
860 (II) Fluoro CUMYL-PICA (N-(2-Phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-
861 (fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide).
862 o. Other Synthetic Cannabinoids.—Any material, compound,
863 mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of a
864 Synthetic Cannabinoid, as described in sub-subparagraphs a.-n.:
865 (I) With or without modification or replacement of a
866 carbonyl, carboxamide, alkylene, alkyl, or carboxylate linkage
867 between either two core rings, or linkage between a core ring
868 and group structure, with or without the addition of a carbon or
869 replacement of a carbon;
870 (II) With or without replacement of a core ring or group
871 structure, whether or not substituted on the ring or group
872 structures to any extent; and
873 (III) Is a cannabinoid receptor agonist, unless
874 specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule or
875 contained within a pharmaceutical product approved by the United
Page 35 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
876 States Food and Drug Administration.
877 191. Substituted Cathinones.—Unless specifically excepted,
878 listed in another schedule, or contained within a pharmaceutical
879 product approved by the United States Food and Drug
880 Administration, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation,
881 including its salts, isomers, esters, or ethers, and salts of
882 isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence of such salts
883 is possible within any of the following specific chemical
884 designations:
885 a. Any compound containing a 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone
886 structure;
887 b. Any compound containing a 2-amino-1-naphthyl-1-
888 propanone structure; or
889 c. Any compound containing a 2-amino-1-thiophenyl-1-
890 propanone structure, whether or not the compound is further
891 modified:
892 (I) With or without substitution on the ring system to any
893 extent with alkyl, alkylthio, thio, fused alkylenedioxy, alkoxy,
894 haloalkyl, hydroxyl, nitro, fused furan, fused benzofuran, fused
895 dihydrofuran, fused tetrahydropyran, fused alkyl ring, or halide
896 substituents;
897 (II) With or without substitution at the 3-propanone
898 position with an alkyl substituent or removal of the methyl
899 group at the 3-propanone position;
900 (III) With or without substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen
Page 36 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
901 atom with alkyl, dialkyl, acetyl, or benzyl groups, whether or
902 not further substituted in the ring system; or
903 (IV) With or without inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen
904 atom in a cyclic structure, including, but not limited to:
905 (A) Methcathinone.
906 (B) Ethcathinone.
907 (C) Methylone (3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone).
908 (D) 2,3-Methylenedioxymethcathinone.
909 (E) MDPV (3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone).
910 (F) Methylmethcathinone.
911 (G) Methoxymethcathinone.
912 (H) Fluoromethcathinone.
913 (I) Methylethcathinone.
914 (J) Butylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
915 methylaminobutyrophenone).
916 (K) Ethylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone).
917 (L) BMDP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-benzylcathinone).
918 (M) Naphyrone (Naphthylpyrovalerone).
919 (N) Bromomethcathinone.
920 (O) Buphedrone (alpha-Methylaminobutyrophenone).
921 (P) Eutylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
922 ethylaminobutyrophenone).
923 (Q) Dimethylcathinone.
924 (R) Dimethylmethcathinone.
925 (S) Pentylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
Page 37 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
926 methylaminovalerophenone).
927 (T) Pentedrone (alpha-Methylaminovalerophenone).
928 (U) MDPPP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
929 pyrrolidinopropiophenone).
930 (V) MDPBP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-
931 pyrrolidinobutyrophenone).
932 (W) MPPP (Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone).
933 (X) PPP (Pyrrolidinopropiophenone).
934 (Y) PVP (Pyrrolidinovalerophenone) or
935 (Pyrrolidinopentiophenone).
936 (Z) MOPPP (Methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone).
937 (AA) MPHP (Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone).
938 (BB) F-MABP (Fluoromethylaminobutyrophenone).
939 (CC) Me-EABP (Methylethylaminobutyrophenone).
940 (DD) PBP (Pyrrolidinobutyrophenone).
941 (EE) MeO-PBP (Methoxypyrrolidinobutyrophenone).
942 (FF) Et-PBP (Ethylpyrrolidinobutyrophenone).
943 (GG) 3-Me-4-MeO-MCAT (3-Methyl-4-Methoxymethcathinone).
944 (HH) Dimethylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N,N-
945 dimethylcathinone).
946 (II) 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N,N-diethylcathinone.
947 (JJ) 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylcathinone.
948 (KK) 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylmethcathinone.
949 (LL) 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylethcathinone.
950 (MM) Methylbuphedrone (Methyl-alpha-
Page 38 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
951 methylaminobutyrophenone).
952 (NN) Methyl-alpha-methylaminohexanophenone.
953 (OO) N-Ethyl-N-methylcathinone.
954 (PP) PHP (Pyrrolidinohexanophenone).
955 (QQ) PV8 (Pyrrolidinoheptanophenone).
956 (RR) Chloromethcathinone.
957 (SS) 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-aminoacetophenone.
958 192. Substituted Phenethylamines.—Unless specifically
959 excepted or unless listed in another schedule, or contained
960 within a pharmaceutical product approved by the United States
961 Food and Drug Administration, any material, compound, mixture,
962 or preparation, including its salts, isomers, esters, or ethers,
963 and salts of isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence
964 of such salts is possible within any of the following specific
965 chemical designations, any compound containing a phenethylamine
966 structure, without a beta-keto group, and without a benzyl group
967 attached to the amine group, whether or not the compound is
968 further modified with or without substitution on the phenyl ring
969 to any extent with alkyl, alkylthio, nitro, alkoxy, thio,
970 halide, fused alkylenedioxy, fused furan, fused benzofuran,
971 fused dihydrofuran, or fused tetrahydropyran substituents,
972 whether or not further substituted on a ring to any extent, with
973 or without substitution at the alpha or beta position by any
974 alkyl substituent, with or without substitution at the nitrogen
975 atom, and with or without inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom
Page 39 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
976 in a cyclic structure, including, but not limited to:
977 a. 2C-B (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
978 b. 2C-E (4-Ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
979 c. 2C-T-4 (4-Isopropylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
980 d. 2C-C (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
981 e. 2C-T (4-Methylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
982 f. 2C-T-2 (4-Ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
983 g. 2C-T-7 (4-(n)-Propylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
984 h. 2C-I (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
985 i. 2C-D (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
986 j. 2C-H (2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine).
987 k. 2C-N (4-Nitro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
988 l. 2C-P (4-(n)-Propyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
989 m. MDMA (3,4-Methylenedioxymethamphetamine).
990 n. MBDB (Methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine) or (3,4-
991 Methylenedioxy-N-methylbutanamine).
992 o. MDA (3,4-Methylenedioxyamphetamine).
993 p. 2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine.
994 q. Fluoroamphetamine.
995 r. Fluoromethamphetamine.
996 s. MDEA (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine).
997 t. DOB (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
998 u. DOC (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
999 v. DOET (4-Ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
1000 w. DOI (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
Page 40 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1001 x. DOM (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine).
1002 y. PMA (4-Methoxyamphetamine).
1003 z. N-Ethylamphetamine.
1004 aa. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-hydroxyamphetamine.
1005 bb. 5-Methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine.
1006 cc. PMMA (4-Methoxymethamphetamine).
1007 dd. N,N-Dimethylamphetamine.
1008 ee. 3,4,5-Trimethoxyamphetamine.
1009 ff. 4-APB (4-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran).
1010 gg. 5-APB (5-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran).
1011 hh. 6-APB (6-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran).
1012 ii. 7-APB (7-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran).
1013 jj. 4-APDB (4-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran).
1014 kk. 5-APDB (5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran).
1015 ll. 6-APDB (6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran).
1016 mm. 7-APDB (7-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran).
1017 nn. 4-MAPB (4-(2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran).
1018 oo. 5-MAPB (5-(2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran).
1019 pp. 6-MAPB (6-(2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran).
1020 qq. 7-MAPB (7-(2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran).
1021 rr. 5-EAPB (5-(2-Ethylaminopropyl)benzofuran).
1022 ss. 5-MAPDB (5-(2-Methylaminopropyl)-2,3-
1023 dihydrobenzofuran),
1024
1025 which does not include phenethylamine, mescaline as described in
Page 41 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1026 subparagraph 20., substituted cathinones as described in
1027 subparagraph 191., N-Benzyl phenethylamine compounds as
1028 described in subparagraph 193., or methamphetamine as described
1029 in subparagraph (2)(c)5.
1030 193. N-Benzyl Phenethylamine Compounds.—Unless
1031 specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, or
1032 contained within a pharmaceutical product approved by the United
1033 States Food and Drug Administration, any material, compound,
1034 mixture, or preparation, including its salts, isomers, esters,
1035 or ethers, and salts of isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the
1036 existence of such salts is possible within any of the following
1037 specific chemical designations, any compound containing a
1038 phenethylamine structure without a beta-keto group, with
1039 substitution on the nitrogen atom of the amino group with a
1040 benzyl substituent, with or without substitution on the phenyl
1041 or benzyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, thio,
1042 alkylthio, halide, fused alkylenedioxy, fused furan, fused
1043 benzofuran, or fused tetrahydropyran substituents, whether or
1044 not further substituted on a ring to any extent, with or without
1045 substitution at the alpha position by any alkyl substituent,
1046 including, but not limited to:
1047 a. 25B-NBOMe (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1048 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1049 b. 25B-NBOH (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1050 hydroxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
Page 42 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1051 c. 25B-NBF (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1052 fluorobenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1053 d. 25B-NBMD (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2,3-
1054 methylenedioxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1055 e. 25I-NBOMe (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1056 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1057 f. 25I-NBOH (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1058 hydroxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1059 g. 25I-NBF (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1060 fluorobenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1061 h. 25I-NBMD (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2,3-
1062 methylenedioxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1063 i. 25T2-NBOMe (4-Methylthio-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1064 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1065 j. 25T4-NBOMe (4-Isopropylthio-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1066 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1067 k. 25T7-NBOMe (4-(n)-Propylthio-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1068 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1069 l. 25C-NBOMe (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1070 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1071 m. 25C-NBOH (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1072 hydroxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1073 n. 25C-NBF (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1074 fluorobenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1075 o. 25C-NBMD (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2,3-
Page 43 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1076 methylenedioxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1077 p. 25H-NBOMe (2,5-Dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1078 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1079 q. 25H-NBOH (2,5-Dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1080 hydroxybenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1081 r. 25H-NBF (2,5-Dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1082 fluorobenzyl)]phenethylamine).
1083 s. 25D-NBOMe (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2-
1084 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine),
1085
1086 which does not include substituted cathinones as described in
1087 subparagraph 191.
1088 194. Substituted Tryptamines.—Unless specifically excepted
1089 or unless listed in another schedule, or contained within a
1090 pharmaceutical product approved by the United States Food and
1091 Drug Administration, any material, compound, mixture, or
1092 preparation containing a 2-(1H-indol-3-yl)ethanamine, for
1093 example tryptamine, structure with or without mono- or di-
1094 substitution of the amine nitrogen with alkyl or alkenyl groups,
1095 or by inclusion of the amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic
1096 structure, whether or not substituted at the alpha position with
1097 an alkyl group, whether or not substituted on the indole ring to
1098 any extent with any alkyl, alkoxy, halo, hydroxyl, or acetoxy
1099 groups, including, but not limited to:
1100 a. Alpha-Ethyltryptamine.
Page 44 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1101 b. Bufotenine.
1102 c. DET (Diethyltryptamine).
1103 d. DMT (Dimethyltryptamine).
1104 e. MET (N-Methyl-N-ethyltryptamine).
1105 f. DALT (N,N-Diallyltryptamine).
1106 g. EiPT (N-Ethyl-N-isopropyltryptamine).
1107 h. MiPT (N-Methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine).
1108 i. 5-Hydroxy-AMT (5-Hydroxy-alpha-methyltryptamine).
1109 j. 5-Hydroxy-N-methyltryptamine.
1110 k. 5-MeO-MiPT (5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine).
1111 l. 5-MeO-AMT (5-Methoxy-alpha-methyltryptamine).
1112 m. Methyltryptamine.
1113 n. 5-MeO-DMT (5-Methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine).
1114 o. 5-Me-DMT (5-Methyl-N,N-dimethyltryptamine).
1115 p. 5-MeO-DiPT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine).
1116 q. DiPT (N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine).
1117 r. DPT (N,N-Dipropyltryptamine).
1118 s. 4-Hydroxy-DiPT (4-Hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine).
1119 t. 5-MeO-DALT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diallyltryptamine).
1120 u. 4-AcO-DMT (4-Acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine).
1121 v. 4-AcO-DiPT (4-Acetoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine).
1122 w. 4-Hydroxy-DET (4-Hydroxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine).
1123 x. 4-Hydroxy-MET (4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine).
1124 y. 4-Hydroxy-MiPT (4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N-
1125 isopropyltryptamine).
Page 45 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1126 z. Methyl-alpha-ethyltryptamine.
1127 aa. Bromo-DALT (Bromo-N,N-diallyltryptamine),
1128
1129 which does not include tryptamine, psilocyn as described in
1130 subparagraph 34., or psilocybin as described in subparagraph 33.
1131 195. Substituted Phenylcyclohexylamines.—Unless
1132 specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, or
1133 contained within a pharmaceutical product approved by the United
1134 States Food and Drug Administration, any material, compound,
1135 mixture, or preparation containing a phenylcyclohexylamine
1136 structure, with or without any substitution on the phenyl ring,
1137 any substitution on the cyclohexyl ring, any replacement of the
1138 phenyl ring with a thiophenyl or benzothiophenyl ring, with or
1139 without substitution on the amine with alkyl, dialkyl, or alkoxy
1140 substituents, inclusion of the nitrogen in a cyclic structure,
1141 or any combination of the above, including, but not limited to:
1142 a. BTCP (Benzothiophenylcyclohexylpiperidine) or BCP
1143 (Benocyclidine).
1144 b. PCE (N-Ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine)(Ethylamine analog
1145 of phencyclidine).
1146 c. PCPY (N-(1-Phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine)(Pyrrolidine
1147 analog of phencyclidine).
1148 d. PCPr (Phenylcyclohexylpropylamine).
1149 e. TCP (1-[1-(2-Thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine)(Thiophene
1150 analog of phencyclidine).
Page 46 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1151 f. PCEEA (Phenylcyclohexyl(ethoxyethylamine)).
1152 g. PCMPA (Phenylcyclohexyl(methoxypropylamine)).
1153 h. Methoxetamine.
1154 i. 3-Methoxy-PCE ((3-Methoxyphenyl)cyclohexylethylamine).
1155 j. Bromo-PCP ((Bromophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1156 k. Chloro-PCP ((Chlorophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1157 l. Fluoro-PCP ((Fluorophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1158 m. Hydroxy-PCP ((Hydroxyphenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1159 n. Methoxy-PCP ((Methoxyphenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1160 o. Methyl-PCP ((Methylphenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1161 p. Nitro-PCP ((Nitrophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1162 q. Oxo-PCP ((Oxophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1163 r. Amino-PCP ((Aminophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine).
1164 196. W-15, 4-chloro-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-2-
1165 piperidinylidene]-benzenesulfonamide.
1166 197. W-18, 4-chloro-N-[1-[2-(4-nitrophenyl)ethyl]-2-
1167 piperidinylidene]-benzenesulfonamide.
1168 198. AH-7921, 3,4-dichloro-N-[[1-
1169 (dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]methyl]-benzamide.
1170 199. U47700, trans-3,4-dichloro-N-[2-
1171 (dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methyl-benzamide.
1172 200. MT-45, 1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)-piperazine,
1173 dihydrochloride.
1174 Section 2. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section
1175 893.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 47 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1176 893.13 Prohibited acts; penalties.—
1177 (1)
1178 (i) Except as authorized by this chapter, a person commits
1179 a felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
1180 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, and must be sentenced to a
1181 mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 3 years, if:
1182 1. The person sells, manufactures, or delivers, or
1183 possesses with intent to sell, manufacture, or deliver, any of
1184 the following:
1185 a. Alfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)1.;
1186 b. Carfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)6.;
1187 c. Fentanyl, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)9.;
1188 d. Sufentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)30.;
1189 e. A fentanyl derivative, as described in s.
1190 893.03(1)(a)64. s. 893.03(1)(a)63.;
1191 f. Xylazine, as described in s. 893.03(1)(c)37.;
1192 g.f. A controlled substance analog, as described in s.
1193 893.0356, of any substance described in sub-subparagraphs a.-f.
1194 sub-subparagraphs a.-e.; or
1195 h.g. A mixture containing any substance described in sub-
1196 subparagraphs a.-g. sub-subparagraphs a.-f.; and
1197 2. The substance or mixture listed in subparagraph 1. is
1198 in a form that resembles, or is mixed, granulated, absorbed,
1199 spray-dried, or aerosolized as or onto, coated on, in whole or
1200 in part, or solubilized with or into, a product, when such
Page 48 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1201 product or its packaging further has at least one of the
1202 following attributes:
1203 a. Resembles the trade dress of a branded food product,
1204 consumer food product, or logo food product;
1205 b. Incorporates an actual or fake registered copyright,
1206 service mark, or trademark;
1207 c. Resembles candy, cereal, a gummy, a vitamin, or a
1208 chewable product, such as a gum or gelatin-based product; or
1209 d. Contains a cartoon character imprint.
1210 Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1211 893.131, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1212 893.131 Distribution of controlled substances resulting in
1213 overdose or serious bodily injury.—
1214 (2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a person 18
1215 years of age or older who unlawfully distributes:
1216 1. Heroin, as described in s. 893.03(1)(b)11.;
1217 2. Alfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)1.;
1218 3. Carfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)6.;
1219 4. Fentanyl, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)9.;
1220 5. Sufentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)30.;
1221 6. Fentanyl derivatives, as described in s.
1222 893.03(1)(a)64. s. 893.03(1)(a)63.;
1223 7. A controlled substance analog, as described in s.
1224 893.0356, of any substance specified in subparagraphs 1.-6.; or
1225 8. A mixture containing any substance specified in
Page 49 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1226 subparagraphs 1.-7.,
1227
1228 and an overdose or serious bodily injury of the user results,
1229 commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in
1230 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, when such substance or
1231 mixture is proven to have caused or been a substantial factor in
1232 causing the overdose or serious bodily injury of the user.
1233 Section 4. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
1234 893.135, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1235 893.135 Trafficking; mandatory sentences; suspension or
1236 reduction of sentences; conspiracy to engage in trafficking.—
1237 (1) Except as authorized in this chapter or in chapter 499
1238 and notwithstanding the provisions of s. 893.13:
1239 (c)1. A person who knowingly sells, purchases,
1240 manufactures, delivers, or brings into this state, or who is
1241 knowingly in actual or constructive possession of, 4 grams or
1242 more of any morphine, opium, hydromorphone, or any salt,
1243 derivative, isomer, or salt of an isomer thereof, including
1244 heroin, as described in s. 893.03(1)(b), (2)(a), (3)(c)3., or
1245 (3)(c)4., or 4 grams or more of any mixture containing any such
1246 substance, but less than 30 kilograms of such substance or
1247 mixture, commits a felony of the first degree, which felony
1248 shall be known as "trafficking in illegal drugs," punishable as
1249 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the
1250 quantity involved:
Page 50 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1251 a. Is 4 grams or more, but less than 14 grams, such person
1252 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
1253 of 3 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $50,000.
1254 b. Is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, such
1255 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1256 imprisonment of 15 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1257 $100,000.
1258 c. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 30 kilograms, such
1259 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1260 imprisonment of 25 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1261 $500,000.
1262 2. A person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures,
1263 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
1264 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of
1265 hydrocodone, as described in s. 893.03(2)(a)1.k., codeine, as
1266 described in s. 893.03(2)(a)1.g., or any salt thereof, or 28
1267 grams or more of any mixture containing any such substance,
1268 commits a felony of the first degree, which felony shall be
1269 known as "trafficking in hydrocodone," punishable as provided in
1270 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the quantity involved:
1271 a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 50 grams, such
1272 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1273 imprisonment of 3 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1274 $50,000.
1275 b. Is 50 grams or more, but less than 100 grams, such
Page 51 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1276 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1277 imprisonment of 7 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1278 $100,000.
1279 c. Is 100 grams or more, but less than 300 grams, such
1280 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1281 imprisonment of 15 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1282 $500,000.
1283 d. Is 300 grams or more, but less than 30 kilograms, such
1284 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1285 imprisonment of 25 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1286 $750,000.
1287 3. A person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures,
1288 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
1289 actual or constructive possession of, 7 grams or more of
1290 oxycodone, as described in s. 893.03(2)(a)1.q., or any salt
1291 thereof, or 7 grams or more of any mixture containing any such
1292 substance, commits a felony of the first degree, which felony
1293 shall be known as "trafficking in oxycodone," punishable as
1294 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the
1295 quantity involved:
1296 a. Is 7 grams or more, but less than 14 grams, such person
1297 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
1298 of 3 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $50,000.
1299 b. Is 14 grams or more, but less than 25 grams, such
1300 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
Page 52 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1301 imprisonment of 7 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1302 $100,000.
1303 c. Is 25 grams or more, but less than 100 grams, such
1304 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1305 imprisonment of 15 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1306 $500,000.
1307 d. Is 100 grams or more, but less than 30 kilograms, such
1308 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1309 imprisonment of 25 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1310 $750,000.
1311 4.a. A person who knowingly sells, purchases,
1312 manufactures, delivers, or brings into this state, or who is
1313 knowingly in actual or constructive possession of, 4 grams or
1314 more of:
1315 (I) Alfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)1.;
1316 (II) Carfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)6.;
1317 (III) Fentanyl, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)9.;
1318 (IV) Sufentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)30.;
1319 (V) A fentanyl derivative, as described in s.
1320 893.03(1)(a)64. s. 893.03(1)(a)63.;
1321 (VI) A controlled substance analog, as described in s.
1322 893.0356, of any substance described in sub-sub-subparagraphs
1323 (I)-(V); or
1324 (VII) A mixture containing any substance described in sub-
1325 sub-subparagraphs (I)-(VI),
Page 53 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1326
1327 commits a felony of the first degree, which felony shall be
1328 known as "trafficking in dangerous fentanyl or fentanyl
1329 analogues," punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or
1330 s. 775.084.
1331 b. If the quantity involved under sub-subparagraph a.:
1332 (I) Is 4 grams or more, but less than 14 grams, such
1333 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1334 imprisonment of 7 years, and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1335 $50,000.
1336 (II) Is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, such
1337 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1338 imprisonment of 20 years, and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1339 $100,000.
1340 (III) Is 28 grams or more, such person shall be sentenced
1341 to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 25 years, and
1342 shall be ordered to pay a fine of $500,000.
1343 c. A person 18 years of age or older who violates sub-
1344 subparagraph a. by knowingly selling or delivering to a minor at
1345 least 4 grams of a substance or mixture listed in sub-
1346 subparagraph a. shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term
1347 of not less than 25 years and not exceeding life imprisonment,
1348 and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $1 million if the
1349 substance or mixture listed in sub-subparagraph a. is in a form
1350 that resembles, or is mixed, granulated, absorbed, spray-dried,
Page 54 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1351 or aerosolized as or onto, coated on, in whole or in part, or
1352 solubilized with or into, a product, when such product or its
1353 packaging further has at least one of the following attributes:
1354 (I) Resembles the trade dress of a branded food product,
1355 consumer food product, or logo food product;
1356 (II) Incorporates an actual or fake registered copyright,
1357 service mark, or trademark;
1358 (III) Resembles candy, cereal, a gummy, a vitamin, or a
1359 chewable product, such as a gum or gelatin-based product; or
1360 (IV) Contains a cartoon character imprint.
1361 5. A person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures,
1362 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
1363 actual or constructive possession of, 30 kilograms or more of
1364 any morphine, opium, oxycodone, hydrocodone, codeine,
1365 hydromorphone, or any salt, derivative, isomer, or salt of an
1366 isomer thereof, including heroin, as described in s.
1367 893.03(1)(b), (2)(a), (3)(c)3., or (3)(c)4., or 30 kilograms or
1368 more of any mixture containing any such substance, commits the
1369 first degree felony of trafficking in illegal drugs. A person
1370 who has been convicted of the first degree felony of trafficking
1371 in illegal drugs under this subparagraph shall be punished by
1372 life imprisonment and is ineligible for any form of
1373 discretionary early release except pardon or executive clemency
1374 or conditional medical release under s. 947.149. However, if the
1375 court determines that, in addition to committing any act
Page 55 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1376 specified in this paragraph:
1377 a. The person intentionally killed an individual or
1378 counseled, commanded, induced, procured, or caused the
1379 intentional killing of an individual and such killing was the
1380 result; or
1381 b. The person's conduct in committing that act led to a
1382 natural, though not inevitable, lethal result,
1383
1384 such person commits the capital felony of trafficking in illegal
1385 drugs, punishable as provided in ss. 775.082 and 921.142. A
1386 person sentenced for a capital felony under this paragraph shall
1387 also be sentenced to pay the maximum fine provided under
1388 subparagraph 1.
1389 6. A person who knowingly brings into this state 60
1390 kilograms or more of any morphine, opium, oxycodone,
1391 hydrocodone, codeine, hydromorphone, or any salt, derivative,
1392 isomer, or salt of an isomer thereof, including heroin, as
1393 described in s. 893.03(1)(b), (2)(a), (3)(c)3., or (3)(c)4., or
1394 60 kilograms or more of any mixture containing any such
1395 substance, and who knows that the probable result of such
1396 importation would be the death of a person, commits capital
1397 importation of illegal drugs, a capital felony punishable as
1398 provided in ss. 775.082 and 921.142. A person sentenced for a
1399 capital felony under this paragraph shall also be sentenced to
1400 pay the maximum fine provided under subparagraph 1.
Page 56 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 309 2026
1401 7. A person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures,
1402 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
1403 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of
1404 xylazine, as described in s. 893.03(1)(c)37., or any salt
1405 thereof, or 28 grams or more of any mixture containing any such
1406 substance, commits a felony of the first degree, which felony
1407 shall be known as "trafficking in xylazine," punishable as
1408 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the
1409 quantity involved:
1410 a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 100 grams, such
1411 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1412 imprisonment of 3 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1413 $50,000.
1414 b. Is 100 grams or more, but less than 200 grams, such
1415 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
1416 imprisonment of 7 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of
1417 $100,000.
1418 c. Is 200 grams or more, such person shall be sentenced to
1419 a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 25 years and shall
1420 be ordered to pay a fine of $500,000.
1421 Section 5. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
1422 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon
1423 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect October 1,
1424 2026.
Page 57 of 57
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb309-01-c1